Ohio, session 136, HB866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.2541 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.2541. The eighteenth day of April is designated as "Devo Day" in honor of the new wave band Devo from Akron, which defined the new wave sound and reflected the feelings of a generation. Devo's first official performance was at Kent state university on April 18, 1973.